pt-PT: Tipo de renda: Renda castanha; Renda de película; Renda francesa; Renda HD; Renda normal; Renda suíça macia; Renda suíça; Renda transparente; Outro
fr: Type de dentelle: Dentelle marron; Dentelle film; Dentelle française; Dentelle HD; Dentelle standard; Dentelle suisse douce; Dentelle suisse; Dentelle transparente; Autre
sk-SK: Typ čipky: Hnedá čipka; Filmová čipka; Francúzska čipka; HD čipka; Bežná čipka; Mäkká švajčiarska čipka; Švajčiarska čipka; Priesvitná čipka; Iné
lt-LT: Nėrinių tipas: Rudas tinklelis; Plėvelinis tinklelis; Prancūziškas tinklelis; HD tinklelis; Įprastas tinklelis; Minkštas šveicariškas tinklelis; Šveicariškas tinklelis; Skaidrus tinklelis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta čipke: Rjava čipka; Filmska čipka; Francoska čipka; Čipka HD; Navadna čipka; Mehka švicarska čipka; Švicarska čipka; Prozorna čipka; Drugo
de: Typ des Lace-Materials: Braune Spitze; Filmspitze; Französische Spitze; HD-Spitze; Normale Spitze; Weiche Schweizer Spitze; Schweizer Spitze; Transparente Spitze; Sonstige
zh-TW: 蕾絲網類型: 棕色蕾絲; 薄膜蕾絲; 法國蕾絲; HD 蕾絲; 普通蕾絲; 柔軟瑞士蕾絲; 瑞士蕾絲; 透明蕾絲; 其他
pl: Typ koronki: Brązowa siateczka; Siateczka typu film; Francuska siateczka; Siateczka HD; Zwykła siateczka; Miękka szwajcarska siateczka; Szwajcarska siateczka; Przezroczysta siateczka; Inne
ru: Тип кружева: Коричневая сетка; Пленочная сетка; Французская сетка; Сетка HD; Обычная сетка; Мягкая швейцарская сетка; Швейцарская сетка; Прозрачная сетка; Другое
nl: Kant type: Bruin kant; Filmkant; Frans kant; HD-kant; Standaard kant; Zacht Zwitsers kant; Zwitsers kant; Transparant kant; Overig
bg-BG: Вид дантела: Кафява дантела; Филмова дантела; Френска дантела; HD дантела; Обикновена дантела; Мека швейцарска дантела; Швейцарска дантела; Прозрачна дантела; Друго
vi: Loại ren: màu nâu lace; Lưới màng phim; Lưới Pháp; Lưới HD; Lưới thường; Lưới Thụy Sĩ mềm; Lưới Thụy Sĩ; Lưới trong suốt; Khác
en: Lace type: Brown lace; Film lace; French lace; HD Lace; Regular lace; Soft Swiss lace; Swiss lace; Transparent lace; Other
fi: Nauhatyyppi: Ruskea pitsi; Filmipitsi; Ranskalainen pitsi; HD-pitsi; Tavallinen pitsi; Pehmeä sveitsiläinen pitsi; Sveitsiläinen pitsi; Läpinäkyvä pitsi; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta vezice: Smeđa čipka; Filmska čipka; Francuska čipka; HD čipka; Obična čipka; Mekana švicarska čipka; Švicarska čipka; Prozirna čipka; Ostalo
hu: Tülltípus: Barna csipke; Filmcsipke; Francia csipke; HD csipke; Normál csipke; Puha svájci csipke; Svájci csipke; Átlátszó csipke; Egyéb
ja: レースタイプ: ブラウンレース; フィルムレース; フレンチレース; HDレース; レギュラーレース; ソフトスイスレース; スイスレース; 透明レース; その他
zh-CN: 鞋带类型: 棕色蕾丝; 薄膜蕾丝; 法国蕾丝; 高清蕾丝; 普通蕾丝; 柔软瑞士蕾丝; 瑞士蕾丝; 透明蕾丝; 其他
da: Snøretype: Brun lace; Filmlace; Fransk lace; HD lace; Almindelig lace; Blød schweizisk lace; Schweizisk lace; Gennemsigtig lace; Andet
it: Tipo di intreccio: Lace marrone; Lace in pellicola; Lace francese; Lace HD; Lace normale; Lace svizzero morbido; Lace svizzero; Lace trasparente; Altro
el: Τύπος δαντέλας: Καφέ lace; Film lace; Γαλλικό lace; HD Lace; Κανονικό lace; Μαλακό ελβετικό lace; Ελβετικό lace; Διάφανο lace; Άλλο
cs: Typ krajky/tkaničky: Hnědá krajka; Filmová krajka; Francouzská krajka; HD krajka; Běžná krajka; Jemná švýcarská krajka; Švýcarská krajka; Průhledná krajka; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de șiret: Dantelă maro; Film lace; Dantelă franțuzească; Dantelă HD; Dantelă obișnuită; Dantelă elvețiană moale; Dantelă elvețiană; Dantelă transparentă; Altele
sv: Spetstyp: Brun lace; Film-lace; Fransk lace; HD-lace; Standard-lace; Mjuk schweizisk lace; Schweizisk lace; Genomskinlig lace; Övrigt
th: ประเภทลูกไม้: ลูกไม้สีน้ำตาล; ลูกไม้ฟิล์ม; ลูกไม้ฝรั่งเศส; ลูกไม้ HD; ลูกไม้ธรรมดา; ลูกไม้สวิสนุ่ม; ลูกไม้สวิส; ลูกไม้โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
nb: Type blonde: Brun blonde; Filmblonde; Fransk blonde; HD-blonde; Vanlig blonde; Myk sveitsisk blonde; Sveitsisk blonde; Gjennomsiktig blonde; Annet
pt-BR: Renda tipo: Lace marrom; Film lace; Lace francesa; Lace HD; Lace regular; Lace suíça macia; Lace suíça; Lace transparente; Outro
es: Tipo de encaje: Encaje marrón; Encaje de película; Encaje francés; Encaje HD; Encaje regular; Encaje suizo suave; Encaje suizo; Encaje transparente; Otro
tr: Dantel türü: Kahverengi dantel; Film dantel; Fransız danteli; HD dantel; Normal dantel; Yumuşak İsviçre danteli; İsviçre danteli; Şeffaf dantel; Diğer
ko: 레이스 타입: 갈색 레이스; 필름 레이스; 프렌치 레이스; HD 레이스; 일반 레이스; 소프트 스위스 레이스; 스위스 레이스; 투명 레이스; 기타